Kentucky statutes. TITLE X Elections
Electronic Voting System

117.375.
Definitions for chapter. [Renumbered]

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 360, § 1, effective July 15, 1982; 1990, ch. 48, § 32, effective July 13, 1990; renumbered to §

117.001

by 2020 ch. 89, § 23, effective July 15, 2020.

Compiler’s Notes

This section was renumbered to KRS

117.001

effective June 29, 2021.

117.377.
Acquisition or abandonment of voting equipment or voting system subject to approval of State Board of Elections — Petition in emergency situation.

The legislative body of any county, urban-county government, charter county government, consolidated local government, or unified local government, may acquire by purchase or lease or lease-purchase agreement, or may abandon, any voting equipment or voting system covered by this chapter, if the voting equipment or voting system has been approved by the State Board of Elections. The legislative body shall notify the State Board of Elections that new voting equipment or a new voting system is being installed in the county.

The county clerk of any county may petition the State Board of Elections to allow new voting equipment or a new voting system in the county if an emergency exists. The petition must state the reasons why the present voting equipment or voting system is inadequate. Within sixty (60) days of the receipt of the petition the State Board of Elections shall notify the county clerk whether the permission to obtain new voting equipment or a new voting system is granted or denied. The letter of approval shall be presented to the legislative body for its approval before any new voting equipment or voting system is acquired.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 360, § 2, effective July 15, 1982; 1990, ch. 48, § 33, effective July 13, 1990; 2021 ch. 197, § 42, effective June 29, 2021.

117.379.
Examination of voting system or e-poll book product by State Board of Elections.

Any person or corporation owning, manufacturing, or selling any voting system or e-poll book product, may request the State Board of Elections to examine the voting system or e-poll book product. Before requesting an examination or reexamination, any person, persons, or corporation shall pay to the State Treasurer a nonrefundable deposit of five hundred dollars ($500) and submit a test report from an independent testing authority approved by the State Board of Elections.

If the report concerns a voting system, the report shall demonstrate that the voting system meets all Election Assistance Commission standards. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, if these Election Assistance Commission standards have been amended less than thirty-six (36) months prior to the request for examination under this subsection, the State Board of Elections may approve and certify a voting system that meets the prior standards after determining:

The effect that such approval would have on the integrity and security of elections; and

The procedure and cost involved to bring the voting system into compliance with the amended standards.

The State Board of Elections may, at any time, reexamine any voting system or e-poll book product already approved. The State Board of Elections shall approve or disapprove any voting system or e-poll book product within sixty (60) days after the date of its initial submission. Any or all costs associated with the voting system or e-poll book product being examined or reexamined shall be paid to the State Treasurer by the person or corporation once the approval or disapproval is complete.

Upon receipt of a request for examination or reexamination of a voting system or e-poll book product, the State Board of Elections shall require that such voting system or e-poll book product be examined or reexamined by three (3) examiners. The State Board of Elections shall appoint one (1) examiner who is an expert in computer science, voting systems, or e-poll book products, whichever is applicable; one (1) person who is knowledgeable in election procedures, election security, and election law in Kentucky; and one (1) person who is a present or former county clerk. The three (3) examiners shall submit one (1) written report on each voting system or e-poll book product, examined or reexamined, to the State Board of Elections. The members of the State Board of Elections shall also examine or reexamine the voting system or e-poll book product.

A voting system shall be approved and certified if the examiners’ report states that the voting system meets all the requirements of KRS

117.125

and applicable federal law, and the State Board of Elections finds that the voting system meets all of the requirements of KRS

117.125

and applicable federal law.

Beginning September 1, 2022, an e-poll book product shall be approved and certified if the examiners’ report and the State Board of Elections find that the e-poll book product meets the certification requirements promulgated by the State Board of Elections pursuant to KRS Chapter 13A and applicable federal law.

Each report and letter of approval pertaining to a voting system or an e-poll book product shall be filed in the office of the State Board of Elections.

Any voting system or e-poll book product not approved by the State Board of Elections shall not be used at any primary, regular election, or special election.

When a voting system or e-poll book product has been approved, any improvement or changes in the voting system or e-poll book product shall render necessary the examination or approval of such voting system or improvement.

Neither the members of the State Board of Elections, nor any examiner appointed by the State Board of Elections, nor any member of a county board of elections shall have any pecuniary interest in any voting system or e-poll book product.

Each examiner appointed by the State Board of Elections shall receive fair compensation to be established by the State Board of Elections.

An e-poll book product approved under this section shall not be used in any primary, regular election, or special election held before May 11, 2023.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 360, § 3, effective July 15, 1982; 1996, ch. 195, § 11, effective July 15, 1996; 2021 ch. 197, § 43, effective June 29, 2021; 2022 ch. 172, § 3, effective July 14, 2022.

117.381.
Requirements for approval. [Repealed]

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 360, § 4, effective July 15, 1982; 1992, ch. 421, § 2, effective July 14, 1992; 1996, ch. 195, § 12, effective July 15, 1996; repealed by 2021 ch. 197, § 87, effective June 29, 2021.

117.383.
Administrative regulations relating to voting.

The State Board of Elections shall promulgate administrative regulations under KRS Chapter 13A which shall maintain the maximum degree of correctness, impartiality, and efficiency of the procedures of voting and shall provide methods to:

Count, tabulate, and record votes;

Place items on any ballot which shall, as closely as possible, follow the requirements pertaining to ballots;

Design the ballots to include a system to ensure an accurate record of all voting activities;

Instruct voters in the use of the voting system, including any ballot marking device;

Provide for checking the accuracy of the voting system;

Provide necessary supplies, including those necessary for a write-in vote, to ensure voter privacy;

As part of the official canvass, provide for a manual recount of randomly selected precincts representing three percent (3%) to five percent (5%) of the total ballots cast in each election;

Provide for the conducting and review of an audit of any component of a voting system or any voting equipment, and a review of any audit log;

Provide for the conducting and review of an election audit, including a risk-limiting audit, and risk-limiting audit pilot program, all of which shall establish the protocol by which ballots are checked, compared, and verified with the results produced by vote tallying equipment to ensure accuracy.

The pilot program shall, at a minimum, include individuals representing the State Board of Elections, the Office of the Secretary of State, and no fewer than five percent (5%) of Kentucky’s counties.

The risk-limiting audit and risk-limiting audit pilot program shall make the results of its findings available to the public;

Provide a method for maintaining sufficient documents, including ballots and records, so that votes can be recounted;

Ensure the county board of elections produces accurate precinct-by-precinct summaries of tabulation sheets showing the results of each precinct during in-person absentee voting, election day voting, and when a county is approved to use a vote center;

Except as otherwise required in this chapter, all records and papers relating to specified elections be retained for twenty-two (22) months, such documents and records shall be maintained for thirty (30) days following an election; and

Unless contrary to the Help America Vote Act of 2002, ensure that all federal provisional voting shall be conducted in a manner as prescribed by KRS Chapters 116 to 120.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 360, § 5, effective July 15, 1982; 1984, ch. 44, § 5, effective March 2, 1984; 1986, ch. 470, § 19, effective July 15, 1986; 2020 ch. 89, § 24, effective July 15, 2020; 2021 ch. 197, § 44, effective June 29, 2021; 2022 ch. 87, § 17, effective April 7, 2022.

117.385.
Spoiled or defaced ballot.

A voter who spoils or defaces a ballot or marks it erroneously shall return the ballot to an election officer. The election officer shall deliver to the voter another ballot, but no voter may receive more than three (3) ballots including the one originally delivered to the voter. Upon return of a defective ballot, an election officer shall cancel it by writing in ink on the back the word “spoiled.” The canceled ballot shall be placed with spoiled ballots to be returned with the election returns.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 360, § 6, effective July 15, 1982; 2020 ch. 89, § 25, effective July 15, 2020; 2021 ch. 197, § 45, effective June 29, 2021.

117.387.
Absentee voting by electronic system. [Repealed]

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 360, § 7, effective July 15, 1982; repealed by 2021 ch. 197, § 87, effective June 29, 2021.

117.389.
Testing
of automatic tabulating equipment prior to election.

On any day not more than thirty
(30) nor less than five (5) days prior to the election day, the county clerk
shall have the automatic tabulating equipment tested in the manner prescribed
by the State Board of Elections.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 360, § 8, effective July 15, 1982; 1992, ch. 421, § 3, effective July 14, 1992.

117.391.
Application.

The provisions of all laws relating
to elections not inconsistent with Acts 1982, Ch. 360 apply to elections in
all counties in which electronic or electromechanical tabulation of ballots
are used.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 360, § 9, effective July 15, 1982.

117.393.
Biennial
report on status of voting equipment and systems.

Beginning January 1, 1984, the
State Board of Elections shall submit a biennial report to the Legislature
concerning the status of various voting equipment and voting systems that
are in use or are approved for use in this state. This report shall also contain
any recommendations by the Secretary of State as to election law modifications
relating to the acquisition and use of voting equipment and voting systems.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 360, § 10, effective July 15, 1982.